New York, session 2025-2026, S9652.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (n) of subdivision 5 of section 8-107 of the 2 administrative code of the city of New York, as amended by local law 3 number 40 of the city of New York for the year 2016, is amended to read 4 as follows: 5 (n) Discrimination on the basis of occupation prohibited in housing 6 accommodations. (1) Where a housing accommodation or an interest therein 7 is sought or occupied exclusively for residential purposes, the 8 provisions of this subdivision shall be construed to prohibit discrimi- 9 nation on account of a person's occupation in: 10 [(1)] (A) The sale, rental, or leasing of such housing accommodation 11 or interest therein; 12 [(2)] (B) The terms, conditions and privileges of the sale, rental or 13 leasing of such housing accommodation or interest therein; 14 [(3)] (C) Furnishing facilities or services in connection therewith; 15 and 16 [(4)] (D) Representing whether or not such housing accommodation or 17 interest therein is available for sale, rental, or leasing. 18 (2) Nothing in subparagraph one of this paragraph shall prohibit 19 giving occupancy preference to individuals who are involved in artistic 20 activities, provided that such preference is implemented or authorized 21 by an agency or the state of New York. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 23 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14411-01-6